test/src/morphology/V-tiiqedw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - tī’edõ: # Verb 6 'eng /est teha/fin' - full paradigm
     tī’edõ+V+Inf: tī’edõ
     tī’edõ+V+Ger: tī’edsõ
     tī’edõ+V+Sup: tī’emõ
     tī’edõ+V+Sup+Ine: tī’emõõs
     tī’edõ+V+Sup+Ela: tī’emõõst
     tī’edõ+V+Sup+Tra: tī’emõõks
     tī’edõ+V+Sup+Abe: tī’emõõt
     tī’edõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tī’eb
     tī’edõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tī’etõ
     tī’edõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tī’ebõd
     tī’edõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tei
     tī’edõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: teitõ
     tī’edõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: teitõ
     tī’edõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: tī’e
     tī’edõ+V+Cond+Sg3: tī’eks
     tī’edõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: tī’e
     tī’edõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: tī’e
     tī’edõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: tī’egid
     tī’edõ+V+Jus+Sg3: tī’egõ
     tī’edõ+V+QuoSg3: tē’ji
     tī’edõ+V+ActPrfPrc: tī’end
     tī’edõ+V+PssPrfPrc: tī’edõd
